Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5544XD (5) 91 as/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 DNA PROFILING 2 Section 1. Section 81.1, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 12. âPerson required to submit a DNA sampleâ means a person 5 arrested, convicted, adjudicated delinquent, receiving a 6 deferred judgment, or found not guilty by reason of insanity 7 of an offense requiring DNA profiling pursuant to section 8 81.2 . âPerson required to submit a DNA sampleâ also means a 9 person determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant 10 to section 229A.7 . 11 Sec. 2. Section 81.2, subsections 1 and 5, Code 2026, are 12 amended to read as follows: 13 1. A person who is arrested for a felony or aggravated 14 misdemeanor or who receives a deferred judgment for a felony 15 or against whom a judgment or conviction for a felony or 16 aggravated misdemeanor has been entered shall be required to 17 submit a DNA sample for DNA profiling pursuant to section 81.4 . 18 5. An offender placed on probation shall immediately report 19 to the judicial district department of correctional services 20 after sentencing so it can be determined if the offender 21 has been arrested or convicted of an offense requiring DNA 22 profiling. If it is determined by the judicial district that 23 DNA profiling is required, the offender shall immediately 24 submit a DNA sample. 25 Sec. 3. Section 81.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsection: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A sample is not required pursuant to 28 this section if it is determined that a sample has previously 29 been taken, is in the possession of the DNA database or DNA 30 data bank established pursuant to section 81.3, and has not 31 been expunged pursuant to section 81.9. 32 Sec. 4. Section 81.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 81.9 Expungement of DNA records. 35 -1- LSB 5544XD (5) 91 as/js 1/ 4 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 1. A person whose DNA record has been included in the DNA 1 database or DNA data bank established pursuant to section 2 81.3 may request, in writing to the division of criminal 3 investigation, expungement of the DNA record from the DNA 4 database and DNA data bank based upon the either of the 5 following: 6 a. The personâs conviction, adjudication, or civil 7 commitment which that caused the submission of the DNA sample 8 being reversed on appeal and the case dismissed. The written 9 request shall contain a certified copy of the final court order 10 reversing the conviction, adjudication, or civil commitment, 11 and a certified copy of the dismissal, and any other 12 information necessary to ascertain the validity of the request. 13 b. The personâs arrest that led to the inclusion of the DNA 14 sample in the DNA database or DNA data bank has resulted in an 15 aggravated misdemeanor or felony charge that has been resolved 16 by dismissal or acquittal, or the failure to file an aggravated 17 misdemeanor or felony charge within one year of arrest. 18 2. The division of criminal investigation, upon receipt of a 19 written request that validates reversal on appeal of a personâs 20 conviction, adjudication, or commitment, and subsequent 21 dismissal of the case, upon receipt of a written request that 22 evidences that an arrest was resolved by dismissal or acquittal 23 or the failure to file charges, or upon receipt of a written 24 request by a person who voluntarily submitted a DNA sample 25 pursuant to section 81.3, subsection 3 , paragraph âbâ , shall 26 expunge all of the DNA records and identifiable information of 27 the person in the DNA database and DNA data bank. However, 28 if the division of criminal investigation determines that the 29 person is otherwise obligated to submit a DNA sample, the DNA 30 records shall not be expunged. If the division of criminal 31 investigation denies an expungement request, the division shall 32 notify the person requesting the expungement of the decision 33 not to expunge the DNA record and the reason supporting its 34 decision. The division of criminal investigation decision 35 -2- LSB 5544XD (5) 91 as/js 2/ 4 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ is subject to judicial review pursuant to chapter 17A . The 1 department of public safety shall adopt rules governing the 2 expungement procedure and a review process. 3 3. The division of criminal investigation is not required 4 to expunge or destroy a DNA record pursuant to this section , 5 if expungement or destruction of the DNA record would destroy 6 evidence related to another person , or investigation . 7 DIVISION II 8 STANDING APPROPRIATION ââ COLD CASES 9 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 13.12A Standing appropriation ââ cold 10 cases. 11 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each 12 fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the 13 general fund of the state to the department of justice six 14 hundred thousand dollars for the purposes of investigation and 15 prosecution of cold cases. 16